ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 衣料品 > スーツ: パンツスーツ; スカートスーツ; タキシード; 未仕立てスーツセット
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Ενδύματα > Κοστούμια (Suits): Κοστούμια με παντελόνι; Ταγιέρ; Σμόκιν; Άρραφα σετ κοστουμιών
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Vestuário > Fatos: Fatos de calças; Fatos de saia; Smoking; Conjuntos de fato por costurar
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 > 정장: 바지 정장; 치마 정장; 턱시도; 미봉제 정장 세트
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházat > Öltönyök: Nadrágos öltönyök; Szoknyás öltönyök; Szmokingok; Varratlan öltönyszettek
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Abbigliamento > Completi: Tailleur giacca e pantaloni; Tailleur giacca e gonna; Smoking e abiti da sera; Set per abiti da cucire
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Облекло > Костюми: Костюми с панталон; Костюми с пола; Смокинги; Комплекти за ушиване на костюм
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatteet > Puvut: Housupuvut; Hamepuvut; Smokit; Ompelemattomat pukusetit
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Roupas > Ternos: Conjuntos com calça; Conjuntos com saia; Smokings; Conjuntos de tecido para ternos
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装 > 西装: 长裤套装; 套装裙; 无尾晚礼服; 未缝制套装
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Quấn áo > Bộ complet: Bộ âu phục; Chân váy công sở; Áo khoác tuxedo; Bộ vải may đồ
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Giyim Eşyaları > Takım Elbiseler: Pantolonlu Takım Elbiseler; Etekli Takım Elbiseler; Smokinler; Dikilmemiş takım elbise setleri
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužiai > Kostiumai: Kostiumėliai su kelnėmis; Kostiumėliai su sijonais; Smokingai; Nesiūti kostiumų komplektai
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Îmbrăcăminte > Costume: Costume cu pantaloni; Costume cu fustă; Smochinguri; Seturi de costume la metraj
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidung > Anzüge: Anzüge & Hosenanzüge; Kostüme; Smokings; Ungenähte Anzug-Sets
es: Ropa y accesorios > Prendas de vestir > Trajes: Trajes de pantalón; Trajes de falda; Esmóquines; Conjuntos de traje sin coser
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Oblačila > Kostimi: Hlačni kostimi; Krilni kostimi; Smokingi; Nezašiti kompleti oblek
en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing > Suits: Pant Suits; Skirt Suits; Tuxedos; Unstitched Suit Sets
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kleding > Pakken: Broekpakken; Mantelpakken; Smokings; Ongestikte pakken
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oblečení > Obleky: Kalhotové kostýmy; Kostýmy se sukní; Smokingy; Nešité oblekové soupravy
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädsel > Kostymer: Kostymer med byxor; Kostymer med kjol; Smokingar; Osydda kostymset
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > เสื้อผ้า > สูท: สูทกางเกง; สูทกระโปรง; ชุดทักซีโด; เซ็ตชุดสูทแบบยังไม่เย็บ
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Odzież > Garnitury: Garnitury ze spodniami; Garnitury ze spódnicami; Smokingi; Niezszyte komplety garniturowe
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klesplagg > Dresser: Buksedresser; Skjørtedresser; Smoking; Usydde dressett
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tøj > Jakkesæt: Buksesæt; Nederdelssæt; Smokinger; Usyede jakkesæt
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Oblečenie > Obleky: Nohavicové kostýmy; Sukňové kostýmy; Smokingy; Bezšvové šatové súpravy
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Odjeća > Odijela: Odijela s hlačama; Odijela sa suknjama; Smokinzi; Nešivani kompleti odijela
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著 > 西裝: 長褲套裝; 西裝裙套裝; 燕尾服; 未剪裁西裝布料套裝
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Vêtements > Costumes et tailleurs: Costumes et tailleurs à pantalon; Tailleurs-jupes; Smokings; Ensembles de costumes non cousus
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Одежда > Костюмы: Брючные костюмы; Костюмы с юбкой; Смокинги; Несшитые костюмы